Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,230
State agency; payment of claims; construction of act.

Nothing in the State Tort Claims Act shall be deemed to repeal any provision of law authorizing any state agency to consider, ascertain, adjust, compromise, settle, determine, allow, or pay any claim other than a tort claim.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 22, p. 2852;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 41.